Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0579.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 3104. (1) The department is designated the state agency to cooperate and negotiate with other governments, governmental units, and governmental agencies in matters concerning the water resources of this state, including, but not limited to, flood control, beach erosion control, water quality control planning, development, and management, and the control of aquatic nuisance species. The department shall have control over the alterations of natural or present watercourses of all rivers and streams in this state to ensure that the channels and the portions of the floodplains that are the floodways are not inhabited and are kept free and clear of interference or obstruction that will cause any undue restriction of the capacity of the floodway. The department may take steps as may be necessary to take advantage of any act of congress that may be of assistance in carrying out the purposes of this part, including the water resources planning act, 42 USC 1962 to 1962d-3, and the federal water pollution control act, 33 USC 1251 to 1389. (2) To address discharges of aquatic nuisance species from oceangoing vessels that damage water quality, aquatic habitat, or fish or wildlife, the department shall facilitate the formation of a Great Lakes aquatic nuisance species coalition. The Great Lakes aquatic nuisance species coalition must be formed through an agreement entered into with other states in the Great Lakes basin to implement on a basin-wide basis water pollution laws that prohibit the discharge of aquatic nuisance species into the Great Lakes from oceangoing vessels. Upon entering into the agreement, the department shall notify the Canadian Great Lakes provinces of the terms of the agreement. The department shall seek funding from the Great Lakes protection fund authorized under part 331 to implement the Great Lakes aquatic nuisance species coalition. (3) The department shall report to the governor and the legislature at least annually on any plans or projects being implemented or considered for implementation. The report must include requests for legislation needed to implement any proposed projects or agreements made necessary as a result of a plan or project, together with any requests for appropriations. The department may make recommendations to the governor on the designation of areawide water quality planning regions and organizations relative to the governors responsibilities under the federal water pollution control act, 33 USC 1251 to 1389. (4) A person shall not alter a floodplain except as authorized by a floodplain permit issued by the department under part 13. An application for a floodplain permit must include information required by the department to assess the proposed alterations impact on the floodplain. If an alteration includes activities at multiple locations in a floodplain, 1 application may be filed for combined activities. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, until October 1, 2029, an application for a floodplain permit must be accompanied by a fee of $500.00. Until October 1, 2029, if the department determines that engineering computations are required to assess the impact of a proposed floodplain alteration on flood stage or discharge characteristics, the department shall assess the applicant an additional $1,500.00 to cover the departments cost of review. (6) After providing notice and an opportunity for a public hearing, the department shall establish minor project categories of activities within floodplains and floodplain projects that are similar in nature, have minimal potential for causing harmful interference when performed separately, and will have only minimal cumulative adverse effects on the environment. All other provisions of this part, except provisions applicable only to floodplain general permits, are applicable to a minor project. A minor project category must not be valid for more than 5 years, but may be re-established. Until October 1, 2029, an application for a floodplain permit for a minor project category must be accompanied by a fee of $100.00. (7) The department, after notice and an opportunity for a public hearing, shall issue general permits on a statewide basis or within a local unit of government for floodplain projects that are similar in nature, have minimal potential for causing harmful interference when performed separately, and will have only minimal cumulative adverse effects on the environment. A general permit category must not be valid for more than 5 years, but may be re-established. Until October 1, 2029, an application for a floodplain permit for a general permit category must be accompanied by a fee of $50.00. (8) By December 31, 2019, the department shall propose new minor project and general project categories as authorized under subsections (6) and (7). (9) The department may issue, deny, or impose conditions on project activities authorized under a floodplain permit for a minor project category or a general permit category if the conditions are designed to remove an impairment to a river and its floodplain, or to mitigate the effects of the project. The department may also establish a reasonable time when the proposed project is to be completed or terminated. (10) If the department determines that activity in a proposed project, although within a floodplain minor project category or a floodplain general permit category, is likely to cause more than minimal adverse environmental effects, the department may require that the application be processed according to subsection (5). (11) If work has been done in violation of a permit requirement under this part and restoration is not ordered by the department, the department may accept an application for a permit for that work if the application is accompanied by a fee equal to 2 times the permit fee otherwise required under this section. (12) The department shall forward fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the land and water management permit fee fund created in section 30113. (13) A project that requires review and approval under this part and 1 or more of the following is subject to only the single highest permit fee required under this part or the following: (a) Part 301. (b) Part 303. (c) Part 323. (d) Part 325. (e) Section 117 of the land division act, 1967 PA 288, MCL 560.117. Sec. 3110. (1) Each industrial or commercial entity, other than a concentrated animal feed operation, that discharges liquid wastes into any surface water or groundwater or underground or on the ground other than through a public sanitary sewer shall have waste treatment or control facilities under the specific supervision and control of individuals who are certified by the department as properly qualified to operate the facilities. The department shall examine all supervisory personnel having supervision and control of the facilities, other than a concentrated animal feed operation, and certify that the individuals are properly qualified to operate or supervise the facilities. (2) The department may conduct a program for training individuals who seek to be certified as operators or supervisors under subsection (1), section 4104, or section 9 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1009. Until October 1, 2029, the department may charge a fee based on the costs to the department of operating this training program. The fees must be deposited into the operator training and certification fund created in section 3134. (3) The department shall administer certification operator programs for individuals who seek to be certified as operators or supervisors under subsection (1), section 4104, or section 9 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1009. An individual who wishes to become certified as an operator or a supervisor shall submit an application to the department that contains the information required by the department. Information submitted as part of the application must be considered part of the examination for certification. Until October 1, 2029, the department may charge a certification examination fee and a certification renewal fee in accordance with the following fee schedule: (a) For certification examinations under subsection (1), the following fees apply: (i) Industrial wastewater certification level 1 or 2 examination as described under subrule (2) of R 323.1253 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $35.00. (ii) Industrial wastewater certification level 3 examination as described under subrule (2) of R 323.1253 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $40.00. (iii) Industrial wastewater special classification A-1a examination or noncontact cooling water A-1h examination as described under subrule (2) of R 323.1253 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $30.00. (iv) Stormwater industrial certification A-1i examination as described under subrule (2) of R 323.1253 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $30.00. (b) For certification examinations under section 4104, the following fees apply: (i) Municipal wastewater certification level A, B, C, or D examination as described under subrule (1) of R 299.2911 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $70.00. (ii) Municipal wastewater certification level L2 examination as described under subrule (3)(a) of R 299.2911 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $45.00. (iii) Municipal wastewater certification level L1 examination as described under subrule (3)(b) of R 299.2911 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $45.00. (iv) Municipal wastewater certification level SC examination as described under subrule (4) of R 299.2911 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $45.00. (c) For certification examinations under section 9 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1009, for operators of the following systems, the following fees apply: (i) Drinking water complete treatment system classes F-1, F-2, F-3, or F-4 as described under subrule (1) of R 325.11901 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $70.00. (ii) Drinking water limited treatment system classes D-1, D-2, D-3, or D-4 as described under subrule (2) of R 325.11901 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $70.00. (iii) Drinking water distribution system classes S-1, S-2, S-3, or S-4 as described under R 325.11902 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $70.00. (iv) Drinking water complete treatment system class F-5 as described under subrule (1) of R 325.11901 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $45.00. (v) Drinking water limited treatment system class D-5 as described under subrule (2) of R 325.11901 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $45.00. (vi) Drinking water distribution system class S-5 as described under R 325.11902 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $45.00. (d) For certification renewals under subsection (1), the following fees apply: (i) Stormwater industrial certification A-1i as described under subrule (2) of R 323.1253 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $95.00. (ii) Stormwater construction certification A-1j as described under subrule (2) of R 323.1253 of the Michigan Administrative Code, $95.00. (iii) All other industrial wastewater certification levels 1, 2, or 3 as described under subrule (2) of R 323.1253 of the Michigan Administrative Code and issued on a single certificate, $95.00. (e) For certification renewals under section 4104 for all municipal wastewater certification levels as described under R 299.2911 of the Michigan Administrative Code and issued on a single certificate, $95.00. (f) For certification renewals under section 9 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1009, for all drinking water certification levels as described under R 325.11901 or R 325.11902 of the Michigan Administrative Code and issued on a single certificate, $95.00. (4) The failure to pay a required certification examination fee within 90 days after taking an examination is considered failure of the examination. The department shall not allow an individual to take a future examination within the failed examination program unless the individual pays the prior fee in full. (5) The department shall conduct a program for persons or organizations seeking to offer approved continuing education courses to be used by certified operators and supervisors when renewing their certifications under subsection (1), section 4104, and section 9 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1009. The department may charge continuing education providers a course application fee and course renewal fee as provided in the following fee schedule: (a) An application for approval of a training course, $75.00 for each course. (b) An application for renewal of an approved training course, $50.00 for each course. (6) All fees collected under this section must be deposited in the operator training and certification fund created in section 3134. (7) An individual certified as required by subsection (1) shall file monthly, or at longer intervals as the department may designate, on forms provided by the department, reports showing the effectiveness of the treatment or control facility operation and the quantity and quality of discharged liquid wastes. If an individual knowingly makes a false statement in a report, the department may revoke the individuals certificate as an approved treatment facility operator. (8) This section does not apply to water, gas, or other material that is injected into a well to facilitate production of oil or gas or to water derived in association with oil or gas production and disposed of in a well, if the well is used either to facilitate production or for disposal purposes and is under permit by the state supervisor of wells. Sec. 3118. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, until October 1, 2029, the department shall collect the following stormwater discharge fees from persons that apply for or have been issued stormwater discharge permits: (a) A 1-time fee of $400.00 for a permit related solely to a site of construction activity for each permitted site. The fee must be submitted with the application for an individual permit or for a certificate of coverage under a general permit. For a permit by rule, the fee must be submitted by the construction site permittee with the notice of coverage. A person that needs more than 1 permit may submit a single payment for more than 1 permit and receive appropriate credit. Payment of the fee under this subdivision or verification of prepayment is a necessary part of a valid permit application or notice of coverage under a permit by rule. (b) An annual fee of $260.00 for a permit related solely to a stormwater discharge associated with industrial activity or from a commercial site for which the department determines a permit is needed. (c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), (e), or (f), an annual fee of $500.00 for a permit for a municipal separate storm sewer system. (d) For a permit for a municipal separate storm sewer system issued to a city, village, or township, an annual fee determined by its population in an urbanized area as defined by the United States Census Bureau and, except as provided in subsection (11), based on the latest available decennial census, as follows: (i) For a population of 1,000 people or fewer, $500.00. (ii) For a population of more than 1,000 people, but fewer than 3,001 people, $1,000.00. (iii) For a population of more than 3,000 people, but fewer than 10,001 people, $2,000.00. (iv) For a population of more than 10,000 people, but fewer than 30,001 people, $3,000.00. (v) For a population of more than 30,000 people, but fewer than 50,001 people, $4,000.00. (vi) For a population of more than 50,000 people, but fewer than 75,001 people, $5,000.00. (vii) For a population of more than 75,000 people, but fewer than 100,001 people, $6,000.00. (viii) For a population of more than 100,000 people, $7,000.00. (e) An annual fee of $3,000.00 for a permit for a municipal separate storm sewer system issued to a county. (f) For a single municipal separate storm sewer systems permit authorizing a state or federal agency to operate municipal separate storm sewer systems in multiple locations statewide, an annual fee determined in accordance with a memorandum of understanding between that state or federal agency and the department and based on the projected costs of the department to administer the permit. (2) A stormwater discharge permit is not required for a municipality that does not own or operate a separate storm sewer system. The department shall not collect stormwater discharge fees under this section from a municipality that does not own or operate a separate storm sewer system. (3) Permit fees required under this section are nonrefundable. (4) A person that possesses a permit not related solely to a site of construction activity as of January 1 shall be assessed a fee. The department shall notify those persons of the fee assessments by February 1. Payment must be postmarked no later than March 15. Failure by the department to send a person a fee assessment notification by the deadline, or failure of a person to receive a fee assessment notification, does not relieve that person of the obligation to pay the fee. If the department does not meet the February deadline for sending the fee assessment, the fee assessment is due not later than 45 days after the permittee receives a fee notification. (5) If a stormwater permit is issued for a drainage district, the drainage district is responsible for the applicable fee under this section. (6) The department shall assess interest on all fee payments submitted under this section after the due date. The permittee shall pay an additional amount equal to 0.75% of the payment due for each month or portion of a month the payment remains past due. (7) The department shall forward fees and interest payments collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit into the fund. (8) The department shall require the payment of the fee assessed under this section as a condition of issuance or reissuance of a permit not related solely to a site of construction activity. (9) In addition to any other penalty provided in this part, if a person fails to pay the fee required under this section by the due date, the person is in violation of this part and the department may undertake enforcement actions as authorized under this part. (10) The attorney general may bring an action to collect overdue fees and interest payments imposed under this section. (11) If the permit is for a municipal separate storm sewer system and the population served by that system is different than that determined by the latest decennial census, the permittee may appeal the annual fee determination and submit written verification of actual population served by the municipal separate storm sewer system. (12) A person that wishes to appeal either a fee or a penalty assessed under this section is limited to an administrative appeal under section 631 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.631. The appeal must be filed not later than 30 days after the departments fee notification under subsection (4). (13) As used in this section and section 3119: (a) Certificate of coverage means a document issued by the department that authorizes a discharge under a general permit. (b) Clean water act means the federal water pollution control act, 33 USC 1251 to 1389. (c) Construction activity means a human-made earth change or disturbance in the existing cover or topography of land that is 5 acres or more in size, for which a national permit is required under 40 CFR 122.26(a), and which is described as a construction activity in 40 CFR 122.26(b)(14)(x). Construction activity includes clearing, grading, and excavating activities. Construction activity does not include the practice of clearing, plowing, tilling soil, and harvesting for the purpose of crop production. (d) Fee means a stormwater discharge fee authorized under this section. (e) Fund means the storm water fund created in section 3119. (f) General permit means a permit issued authorizing a category of similar discharges. (g) Individual permit means a site-specific permit. (h) Municipal separate storm sewer system means all separate storm sewers that are owned or operated by the United States or a state, city, village, township, county, district, association, or other public body created by or under state law, having jurisdiction over disposal of sewage, industrial wastes, stormwater, or other wastes, including special districts under state law, such as a sewer district, flood control district, or drainage district or similar entity, or a designated or approved management agency under section 208 of the clean water act, 33 USC 1288, that discharges to waters of the state. Municipal separate storm sewer system includes systems similar to separate storm sewer systems in municipalities, such as systems at military bases, large hospital or prison complexes, and highways and other thoroughfares. Municipal separate storm sewer system does not include separate storm sewers in very discrete areas, such as individual buildings. (i) Notice of coverage means a notice that a person engaging in construction activity agrees to comply with a permit by rule for that activity. A notice of coverage is not required to include a copy of an individual permit issued under part 91 if the notice of coverage includes a copy of a permit for the construction activity issued under part 615, 625, 631, 632, or 634, along with any forms or diagrams pertaining to soil erosion and sedimentation control that were part of the application for that permit. (j) Permit, unless the context implies otherwise, or stormwater discharge permit means a permit authorizing the discharge of wastewater or any other substance to surface waters of the state under the national pollutant discharge elimination system, pursuant to the clean water act or this part and the regulations or rules promulgated under the clean water act or this part. (k) Public body means the United States, this state, a city, village, township, county, school district, public college or university, or single purpose governmental agency, or any other body that is created by federal or state law. (l) Separate storm sewer system means a system of drainage, including, but not limited to, roads, catch basins, curbs, gutters, parking lots, ditches, conduits, pumping devices, or man-made channels, that has the following characteristics: (i) The system is not a combined sewer where stormwater mixes with sanitary wastes. (ii) The system is not part of a publicly owned treatment works. (m) Stormwater means stormwater runoff, snowmelt runoff, and surface runoff and drainage. (n) Stormwater discharge associated with industrial activity means a point source discharge of stormwater from a facility that is considered to be engaging in industrial activity under 40 CFR 122.26(b)(14)(i) to (ix) and (xi). Sec. 3120. (1) Until October 1, 2029, an application for a new permit, a reissuance of a permit, or a modification of an existing permit under this part authorizing a discharge into surface water, other than a storm water discharge, must be accompanied by an application fee as follows: (a) For an EPA major facility permit, $750.00. (b) For an EPA minor facility individual permit, a CSO permit, or a wastewater stabilization lagoon individual permit, $400.00. (c) For an EPA minor facility general permit, $75.00. (2) Not later than 180 days after receipt of a complete application for a new or increased use permit, the department shall either grant or deny the permit, unless the applicant and the department agree to extend this time period. (3) By September 30 of the year following the submittal of a complete application for reissuance of a permit, the department shall either grant or deny the permit, unless the applicant and the department agree to extend this time period. (4) If the department fails to make a decision on an application within the applicable time period under subsection (2) or (3), all of the following apply: (a) The department shall return to the applicant the application fee submitted under subsection (1). (b) The applicant is not subject to an application fee. (c) The applicant shall receive a 15% annual discount on an annual permit fee required for a permit issued based on that application. (5) Until October 1, 2029, a person that receives a permit under this part authorizing a discharge into surface water, other than a stormwater discharge, is subject to an annual permit fee as follows: (a) For an industrial or commercial facility that is an EPA major facility, $8,700.00. (b) For an industrial or commercial facility that is an EPA minor facility, the following amount: (i) For a general permit for a low-flow facility, $150.00. (ii) For a general permit for a high-flow facility, $400.00. (iii) For an individual permit for a low-flow facility, $1,650.00. (iv) For an individual permit for a high-flow facility, $3,650.00. (c) For a municipal facility that is an EPA major facility, the following amount: (i) For an individual permit for a facility discharging 500 MGD or more, $213,000.00. (ii) For an individual permit for a facility discharging 50 MGD or more but less than 500 MGD, $20,000.00. (iii) For an individual permit for a facility discharging 10 MGD or more but less than 50 MGD, $13,000.00. (iv) For an individual permit for a facility discharging less than 10 MGD, $5,500.00. (d) For a municipal facility that is an EPA minor facility, the following amount: (i) For an individual permit for a facility discharging 10 MGD or more, $3,775.00. (ii) For an individual permit for a facility discharging 1 MGD or more but less than 10 MGD, $3,000.00. (iii) For an individual permit for a facility discharging less than 1 MGD, $1,950.00. (iv) For a general permit for a high-flow facility, $600.00. (v) For a general permit for a low-flow facility, $400.00. (e) For a municipal facility that is a CSO facility, $6,000.00. (f) For an individual permit for a wastewater stabilization lagoon, $1,525.00. (g) For an individual or general permit for an agricultural purpose, $600.00, unless either of the following applies: (i) The facility is an EPA minor facility and would qualify for a general permit for a low-flow facility, in which case the fee is $150.00. (ii) The facility is an EPA major facility that is not a farmers cooperative corporation, in which case the fee is $8,700.00. (h) For a facility that holds a permit issued under this part but has no discharge and is connected to and is authorized to discharge only to a municipal wastewater treatment system, an annual permit maintenance fee of $100.00. However, if a facility does have a discharge or at some time is no longer connected to a municipal wastewater treatment system, the annual permit fee must be the appropriate fee as otherwise provided in this subsection. (6) If the person required to pay an application fee under subsection (1) or an annual permit fee under subsection (5) is a municipality, the municipality may pass on the application fee or the annual permit fee, or both, to each user of the municipal facility. (7) The department shall send invoices for annual permit fees under subsection (5) to all permit holders by December 1 of each year. A fee must be based on the status of the facility as of October 1 of that year. A person subject to an annual permit fee shall pay the fee not later than January 15 of each year. Failure by the department to send a person an invoice by December 1, or failure of a person to receive an invoice, does not relieve that person of the obligation to pay the annual permit fee. If the department does not send invoices by December 1, the annual permit fee is due not later than 45 days after the permittee receives an invoice. The department shall forward annual permit fees received under this section to the state treasurer for deposit into the national pollutant discharge elimination system fund created in section 3121. (8) The department shall assess a penalty on all annual permit fee payments submitted under this section after the due date. The penalty is 0.75% of the payment due for each month or portion of a month the payment remains past due. (9) Following payment of an annual permit fee, if a permittee wishes to challenge its annual permit fee under this section, the owner or operator shall submit the challenge in writing to the department. The department shall not process the challenge unless it is received by the department by March 1 of the year the payment is due. A challenge must identify the facility and state the grounds on which the challenge is based. Not later than 30 calendar days after receipt of the challenge, the department shall determine the validity of the challenge and provide the permittee with notification of a revised annual permit fee and a refund, if appropriate, or a statement setting forth the reason or reasons why the annual permit fee was not revised. If the owner or operator of a facility desires to further challenge its annual permit fee, the owner or operator of the facility has an opportunity for a contested case hearing as provided for under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (10) The attorney general may bring an action for the collection of the annual permit fee imposed under this section. (11) As used in this section: (a) Agricultural purpose means the agricultural production or processing of those plants and animals useful to human beings produced by agriculture and includes, but is not limited to, forages and sod crops, grains and feed crops, field crops, dairy animals and dairy products, poultry and poultry products, cervidae, livestock, including breeding and grazing, equine, fish and other aquacultural products, bees and bee products, berries, herbs, fruits, vegetables, flowers, seeds, grasses, nursery stock, trees and tree products, mushrooms, and other similar products, or any other product, as determined by the commission of agriculture and rural development, that incorporates the use of food, feed, fiber, or fur. Agricultural purpose includes an operation or facility that produces wine. (b) Combined sewer overflow means a discharge from a combined sewer system that occurs when the flow capacity of the combined sewer system is exceeded at a point before the headworks of a publicly owned treatment works during wet weather conditions. (c) Combined sewer system means a sewer designed and used to convey both storm water runoff and sanitary sewage, and that contains lawfully installed regulators and control devices that allow for delivery of sanitary flow to treatment during dry weather periods and divert stormwater and sanitary sewage to surface waters during storm flow periods. (d) CSO facility means a facility whose discharge is solely a combined sewer overflow. (e) EPA major facility means a major facility as that term is defined in 40 CFR 122.2. (f) EPA minor facility means a facility that is not an EPA major facility. (g) Farmers cooperative corporation means a farmers cooperative corporation organized within the limitations of section 98 of 1931 PA 327, MCL 450.98. (h) General permit means a permit suitable for use at facilities meeting eligibility criteria as specified in the permit. With a general permit, the discharge from a specific facility is acknowledged through a certificate of coverage issued to the facility. (i) High-flow facility means a facility that discharges 1 MGD or more. (j) Individual permit means a permit developed for a particular facility, taking into account that facilitys specific characteristics. (k) Industrial or commercial facility means a facility that is not a municipal facility. (l) Low-flow facility means a facility that discharges less than 1 MGD. (m) MGD means 1,000,000 gallons per day. (n) Municipal facility means a facility that is designed to collect or treat sanitary wastewater, is either publicly or privately owned, and serves a residential area or a group of municipalities. (o) Wastewater stabilization lagoon means a treatment system constructed of ponds or basins designed to receive, hold, and treat sanitary wastewater for a predetermined amount of time through a combination of physical, biological, and chemical processes. Sec. 4104. (1) The department may promulgate and enforce rules that the department considers necessary to govern and provide for a method of conducting and operating all or a part of sewerage systems including sewage treatment works. The department shall classify sewage treatment works with regard to size, type, location, and other physical conditions affecting those works and according to the skill, knowledge, experience, and character that the individual who is in charge of the active operation of the sewage treatment works must possess to successfully operate the works and prevent the discharge of deleterious matter capable of being injurious to the public health or other public interests. The department shall examine or provide for the examination of individuals as to the qualifications to operate sewage treatment works. The department shall promulgate rules regarding the classification of sewage treatment works, the examinations for certification of operators for those works, and the issuance and revocation of certificates, and shall issue and revoke certificates as provided by the rules. Every sewage treatment works subject to this part must be under the supervision of a properly certified operator, except that this section does not require the employment of a certified operator in a waste treatment works that receives only wastes that are not potentially prejudicial to the public health. (2) As provided in section 3110, the department may conduct a program for training individuals who seek to be certified as operators under subsection (1) and shall administer operator certification programs for individuals who seek to be certified as operators under subsection (1). Until October 1, 2029, the department may charge fees for these programs as provided in section 3110. The department shall transmit fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit into the operator training and certification fund created in section 3134. Sec. 11153. (1) A generator, transporter, or treatment, storage, or disposal facility shall obtain and utilize a site identification number assigned by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or the department. Until October 1, 2029, the department shall assess a site identification number user charge of $50.00 for each site identification number the department issues. The department shall not issue a site identification number under this subsection unless the site identification number user charge and the tax identification number for the person applying for the site identification number are received by the department. (2) Until October 1, 2029, the department shall annually assess hazardous waste management program user charges as follows: (a) A generator shall pay a handler user charge that is the highest of the following applicable fees: (i) A generator that generates more than 100 kilograms but less than 1,000 kilograms of hazardous waste in any month during the calendar year shall pay to the department an annual handler user charge of $100.00. (ii) A generator that generates 1,000 kilograms or more of hazardous waste in any month during the calendar year and that generates less than 900,000 kilograms during the calendar year shall pay to the department an annual handler user charge of $400.00. (iii) A generator that generates 1,000 kilograms or more of hazardous waste in any month during the calendar year and that generates 900,000 kilograms or more of hazardous waste during the calendar year shall pay to the department an annual handler user charge of $1,000.00. (b) An owner or operator of a treatment, storage, or disposal facility for which an operating license is required under section 11123 or for which an operating license is issued under section 11125 shall pay to the department an annual handler user charge of $2,000.00. (c) A used oil processor or rerefiner, a used oil burner, or a used oil fuel marketer as defined in the rules promulgated under this part shall pay to the department an annual handler user charge of $100.00. (3) A handler shall pay the handler user charge specified in subsection (2) for each of the activities conducted during the previous calendar year. (4) Handler user charges must be paid using a form provided by the department. The handler shall certify that the information on the form is accurate. The department shall send forms to the handlers not later than March 30 of each year. A handler shall return the completed forms and the appropriate payment to the department not later than April 30 of each year. (5) A handler that fails to provide timely and accurate information, a complete form, or the appropriate handler user charge is in violation of this part and is subject to both of the following: (a) Payment of the handler user charge and an administrative fine of 5% of the amount owed for each month that the payment is delinquent. Any payments received after the fifteenth of the month after the due date are delinquent for that month. However, the administrative fine must not exceed 25% of the total amount owed. (b) Beginning 5 months after the date payment of the handler user charge is due, if the amount owed under subdivision (a) is not paid in full, at the request of the department, an action by the attorney general for the collection of the amount owed under subdivision (a) and the actual cost to the department in attempting to collect the amount owed under subdivision (a). (6) The department shall maintain information regarding the site identification number user charges and the handler user charges collected under this section as necessary to satisfy the reporting requirements of subsection (8). (7) The site identification number user charges and the handler user charges collected under this section and any amounts collected under subsection (5) for a violation of this section must be forwarded to the state treasurer and deposited in the environmental pollution prevention fund created in section 11130. (8) The department shall evaluate the effectiveness and adequacy of the site identification number user charges and the handler user charges collected under this section relative to the overall revenue needs of the hazardous waste management program administered under this part. Not later than April 1 of each even-numbered year, the department shall submit to the legislature a report summarizing the departments findings under this subsection. (9) As used in this section: (a) Handler means the person required to pay the handler user charge. (b) Handler user charge means an annual hazardous waste management program user charge provided for in subsection (2). Sec. 30104. (1) A person shall not undertake a project subject to this part except as authorized by a permit issued by the department under part 13. An application for a permit must include any information that may be required by the department. If a project includes activities at multiple locations, 1 application may be filed for the combined activities. (2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4), until October 1, 2029, an application for a permit must be accompanied by an application fee based on an administrative cost in accordance with the following schedule: (a) For an initial permit for a seasonal drawdown or associated reflooding, or both, of a dam or impoundment for the purpose of weed control that is issued for the first time after October 9, 1995, a fee of $500.00, but for subsequent permits for the same purpose a fee of $50.00. (b) For activities included in a minor project category established under section 30105(7), a fee of $100.00. (c) For activities included in a general permit category established under section 30105(8), a fee of $50.00. (d) For construction or expansion of a marina, a fee as follows: (i) $50.00 for an expansion of 1-10 marina slips to an existing permitted marina. (ii) $100.00 for a new marina with 1-10 proposed marina slips. (iii) $250.00 for an expansion of 11-50 marina slips to an existing permitted marina, plus $10.00 for each marina slip over 50. (iv) $500.00 for a new marina with 11-50 proposed marina slips, plus $10.00 for each marina slip over 50. (v) $1,500.00 if an existing permitted marina proposes maintenance dredging of 10,000 cubic yards or more, unless the dredge material is determined through testing to be 90% or more sand, or the addition of seawalls, bulkheads, or revetments of 500 feet or more. (e) For major projects other than a project described in subdivision (d)(v), involving any of the following, a fee of $2,000.00: (i) Dredging of 10,000 cubic yards or more, unless the dredge material is determined through testing to be 90% or more sand. (ii) Filling of 10,000 cubic yards or more. (iii) Seawalls, bulkheads, or revetments of 500 feet or more. (iv) Filling or draining of 1 acre or more of wetland contiguous to a lake or stream. (v) New dredging or upland boat basin excavation in areas of suspected contamination. (vi) Shore projections, such as groins and underwater stabilizers, that extend 150 feet or more into a lake or stream. (vii) New commercial docks or wharves of 300 feet or more in length. (viii) Stream enclosures 100 feet or more in length. (ix) Stream relocations 500 feet or more in length. (x) New golf courses. (xi) Subdivisions. (xii) Condominiums. (f) For the removal of submerged logs from bottomland of an inland lake, a $500.00 fee. (g) For all other projects not listed in subdivisions (a) to (f), a fee of $500.00. (3) A project that requires review and approval under this part and 1 or more of the following acts or parts of acts is subject to only the single highest fee required under this part or the following acts or parts of acts: (a) Section 3104. (b) Part 303. (c) Part 323. (d) Part 325. (e) Section 117 of the land division act, 1967 PA 288, MCL 560.117. (4) If work has been done in violation of a permit requirement under this part and restoration is not ordered by the department, the department may accept an application for a permit if the application is accompanied by a fee equal to 2 times the permit fee required under this section. (5) If the department denies an application for a permit under this part, the department shall promptly refund the application fee paid under this section. Sec. 30109. Upon the written request of a riparian owner and upon payment of a service fee, the department may enter into a written agreement with the riparian owner establishing the location of the ordinary high-water mark for the riparian owners property. In the absence of substantially changed conditions, the agreement is conclusive proof of the location in all matters between this state and the riparian owner and the riparian owners successors in interest. Until October 1, 2029, the service fee provided for in this section is $500.00. The department shall forward service fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit into the fund. Sec. 32312. (1) To regulate the uses and development of high-risk areas, flood risk areas, and environmental areas and to implement the purposes of this part, the department shall promulgate rules in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. If permits are required under rules promulgated under this part, the permits must be issued in accordance with the rules and part 13. Except as provided under subsection (2), until October 1, 2029, if permits are required under the rules promulgated under this part, an application for a permit must be accompanied by a fee as follows: (a) For a commercial or multifamily residential project, $500.00. (b) For a single-family home construction, $100.00. (c) For an addition to an existing single-family home or for a project that has a minor impact on fish and wildlife resources in environmental areas as determined by the department, $50.00. (2) A project that requires review and approval under this part and under 1 or more of the following is subject to only the single highest permit fee required under this part or the following: (a) Part 301. (b) Part 303. (c) Part 325. (d) Section 3104. (e) Section 117 of the land division act, 1967 PA 288, MCL 560.117. (3) The department shall forward fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the land and water management permit fee fund created in section 30113. (4) A circuit court, upon petition and a showing by the department that a rule promulgated under subsection (1) has been violated, shall issue any necessary order to the defendant to correct the violation or to restrain the defendant from further violation of the rule. Sec. 32513. (1) To obtain a permit for any activity specified in section 32512, a person shall file an application with the department on a form provided by the department. The application must include all of the following: (a) The name and address of the applicant. (b) The legal description of the lands included in the project. (c) A summary statement of the purpose of the project. (d) A map or diagram showing the proposal on an adequate scale with contours and cross-section profiles of any waterway to be constructed. (e) Other information required by the department. (2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4), until October 1, 2029, an application for a permit under this section must be accompanied by the following fee, as applicable: (a) For a project in a category of activities for which a general permit is issued under section 32512a(2), a fee of $50.00. (b) For activities included in a minor project category established under section 32512a(1), a fee of $100.00. (c) For construction or expansion of a marina, a fee of: (i) $50.00 for an expansion of 1-10 marina slips to an existing permitted marina. (ii) $100.00 for a new marina with 1-10 proposed marina slips. (iii) $250.00 for an expansion of 11-50 marina slips to an existing permitted marina, plus $10.00 for each marina slip over 50. (iv) $500.00 for a new marina with 11-50 proposed marina slips, plus $10.00 for each marina slip over 50. (v) $1,500.00 if an existing permitted marina proposes maintenance dredging of 10,000 cubic yards or more, unless the dredge material is determined through testing to be 90% or more sand, or the addition of seawalls, bulkheads, or revetments of 500 feet or more. (d) For major projects other than a project described in subdivision (c)(v), involving any of the following, a fee of $2,000.00: (i) Dredging of 10,000 cubic yards or more, unless the dredge material is determined through testing to be 90% or more sand. (ii) Filling of 10,000 cubic yards or more. (iii) Seawalls, bulkheads, or revetment of 500 feet or more. (iv) Filling or draining of 1 acre or more of coastal wetland. (v) New dredging or upland boat basin excavation in areas of suspected contamination. (vi) New breakwater or channel jetty. (vii) Shore protection, such as groins and underwater stabilizers, that extend 150 feet or more on Great Lakes bottomlands. (viii) New commercial dock or wharf of 300 feet or more in length. (e) For all other projects not listed in subdivisions (a) to (d), $500.00. (3) A project that requires review and approval under this part and 1 or more of the following is subject to only the single highest permit fee required under this part or the following: (a) Section 3104. (b) Part 301. (c) Part 303. (d) Part 323. (e) Section 117 of the land division act, 1967 PA 288, MCL 560.117. (4) If work is done in violation of a permit requirement under this part and restoration is not ordered by the department, the department may accept an application for a permit if the application is accompanied by a fee equal to 2 times the permit fee otherwise required under this section. (5) The department shall forward fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit into the land and water management permit fee fund created in section 30113. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor